Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 5. Interstate Agreements for Protection of Children Being Provided Adoption Assistance.

§ 93-17-101.
Legislative findings; purpose.

The Legislature finds that:

Locating adoptive families for children for whom state assistance is desirable, pursuant to the Mississippi adoption assistance law, and assuring the protection of the interests of the children affected during the entire assistance period, require special measures when the adoptive parents move to other states or are residents of another state; and

Providing medical and other necessary services for children, with state assistance, encounters special difficulties when the providing of services takes place in other states.

The purposes of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109 are to:

Authorize the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare to enter into interstate agreements with agencies of other states for the protection of children on behalf of whom adoption assistance is being provided by the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare; and

Provide procedures for interstate children’s adoption assistance payments, including medical payments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-17-103.
Development of interstate compacts; authority of Department of Public Welfare; definitions.

The Mississippi Department of Public Welfare is authorized to develop, participate in the development of, negotiate and enter into one or more interstate compacts on behalf of this state with other states to implement one or more of the purposes set forth in Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109. When so entered into, and for so long as it shall remain in force, such a compact shall have the force and effect of law.

For the purposes of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109, the term “state” shall mean a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, the Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands or a territory or possession of or administered by the United States.

For the purposes of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109, the term “adoption assistance state” means the state that is signatory to an adoption assistance agreement in a particular case.

For the purposes of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109, the term “residence state” means the state of which the child is a resident by virtue of the residence of the adoptive parents.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 401, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-17-105.
Interstate compacts; requirements.

A compact entered into pursuant to the authority conferred by Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109 shall contain the following:

A provision making the compact available for joinder by all states;

A provision or provisions for withdrawal from the compact upon written notice to the parties, but with a period of one (1) year between the date of the notice and the effective date of the withdrawal;

A requirement that the protections afforded by or pursuant to the compact continue in force for the duration of the adoption assistance and be applicable to all children and their adoptive parents who on the effective date of the withdrawal are receiving adoption assistance from a party state other than the one in which they are resident and have their principal place of abode;

A requirement that each instance of adoption assistance to which the compact applies be covered by an adoption assistance agreement in writing between the adoptive parents and the state child welfare agency of the state which undertakes to provide the adoption assistance, and further, that any such agreement be expressly for the benefit of the adopted child and enforceable by the adoptive parents and the state agency providing the adoption assistance; and

Such other provisions as may be appropriate to implement the proper administration of the compact.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 401, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-17-107.
Medicaid eligibility; medical assistance identification; penalties for false statement or claim; applicability.

A child with special needs resident in this state who is the subject of an adoption assistance agreement with another state and who has been determined eligible for medicaid in that state shall be entitled to receive a medical assistance identification from this state upon filing with the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare a certified copy of the adoption assistance agreement obtained from the adoption assistance state which certifies to the eligibility of the child for medicaid. In accordance with regulations of the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare, the adoptive parents shall be required, at least annually, to show that the agreement is still in force or has been renewed.

The Division of Medicaid, Office of the Governor, shall consider the holder of a medical assistance identification pursuant to this section as any other holder of a medical assistance identification under the laws of this state and shall process and make payment on claims on account of such holder in the same manner and pursuant to the same conditions and procedures as for other recipients of medical assistance.

The submission of any claim for payment or reimbursement for services or benefits pursuant to this section or the making of any statement in connection therewith, which claim or statement the maker knows or should know to be false, misleading or fraudulent shall be punishable as perjury and shall also be subject to a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or imprisonment for not to exceed two (2) years, or both.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to medical assistance for children under adoption assistance agreements from states that have entered into a compact with this state under which the other state provides medical assistance to children with special needs under adoption assistance agreements made by this state. All other children entitled to medical assistance pursuant to adoption assistance agreements entered into by this state shall be eligible to receive it in accordance with the laws and procedures applicable thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 401, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 93-17-109.
Inclusion of federal aid in certain state plans.

Consistent with federal law, the Mississippi Department of Public Welfare and the Division of Medicaid, Office of the Governor of the State of Mississippi, in connection with the administration of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109 and any compact entered into pursuant hereto, shall include in any state plan made pursuant to the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 (P.L. 96-272), Titles IV(e) and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other applicable federal laws, the provision of adoption assistance and medical assistance for which the federal government pays some or all of the cost provided such authority is granted under the provisions of some law of this state other than the provisions of Sections 93-17-101 through 93-17-109. Such departments shall apply for and administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 401, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989.